Hawaii statutes.
§608-1 Personnel and expenses of circuit
courts. The State shall pay the expenses of the several circuit courts and
the salaries of such officers and employees as may be required by such courts,
including without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing, expenses of the
family courts and agencies thereof. The judge or judges of the several circuit
courts shall appoint such officers and employees as may be required by the
courts and for which appropriations have been made by the legislature; provided
that the officers and employees of the family court of the first circuit,
including without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing probation
officers, truant officers, and personnel of the detention home, shall be
appointed by the judge of the family court under whose supervision the
appropriations for the division shall be expended. Except as otherwise
provided, the officers and employees shall be members of the civil service
system of the State and shall be subject to chapter 76 and the appropriate
collective bargaining agreement, executive order, executive directive, or rule.
[RL 1935, 1st and last par of §3940; am L 1937, c 215, §3; am L Sp 1941, c 94,
§1; RL 1945, §9771; am L 1945, c 35, §1 and c 142, §4; RL 1955, §220-1; am L
1965, c 232, §1; HRS §608-1; am L 1972, c 88, §7(a), (b); am L 2002, c 148,
§43]

Note

For prior history, see note to §9771, RL 1945.

Case Notes

Anticipatory assignment of salary by public officer is void
as being against public policy. 25 H. 43 (1919).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next